Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4894.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 207. (1) The department, in consultation with the appropriate board, shall promulgate any rules it the department considers necessary and appropriate to implement and administer articles 1 to 6 and to enable the department to fulfill its the department's responsibilities under this act. (2) The department, in consultation with the appropriate board, shall promulgate rules to establish the fees for licenses, examinations, and inspections. The fees shall must reflect the actual costs and expenses of the department in issuing licenses and conducting inspections. The fees in effect on the day immediately preceding the effective date of this act shall April 3, 2017 continue in effect until the department promulgates rules under this subsection. This subsection does not apply to any specific fee if the amount of that fee is established in this act. (3) The department, in consultation with the appropriate board, shall promulgate rules to establish the fee schedules for other items, including, but not limited to, variance requests, product approvals, or special inspections. The fees shall must reflect the actual costs and expenses of the department for those items. (4) The Subject to section 1020, the department may promulgate rules to set the minimal standards of acceptable practice for an occupation. Sec. 1020. (1) An individual shall retain qualifying experience for 5 years after the individual received that experience. (2) The department shall not promulgate or enforce a rule that requires an applicant to have received or otherwise completed qualifying experience within the 5 years immediately preceding the submission of an application for registration as a building inspector.